Hawaii statutes.
CHAPTER
653

GARNISHMENT
OF GOVERNMENT BENEFICIARIES

Section

653-1 Government beneficiary defined

653-2 Attachment of salary, etc.

653-3 Exemptions; pensions

653-4 Further exemption

653-5 Complaint

653-6 Garnishee summons

653-7 Service on garnishee

653-8 Effect of service

653-9 Service on beneficiary

653-10 Superiors and successors of garnishee

653-11 Answer; amount sequestered

653-12 Certificate furnished garnishee

653-13 Effect of discontinuance, appeal, exceptions

653-14 Warrants issued to plaintiff, when

653-15 Actions, precedence

653-16 Same; priority of payments

653-17 Warrants charged against beneficiary

Note

As to procedural statutes superseded by the rules of court,
see note preceding Title 32.

Rules of Court

See HRCP rules 64, 69; DCRCP rules 64, 69. Service, see HRCP
rule 4; DCRCP rule 4.

Case Notes

Validity of prejudgment replevin provisions authorizing
taking of property without affording prior opportunity to be heard. 407 U.S.
67 (1972).

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next